Hawaii statutes.
§435E-23 Member failure to pay. In the
event a participating member fails to pay any assessment when the same is due,
the board of trustees may terminate such person's membership status if such
failure to pay is not cured within thirty days from the date the assessment was
due. Upon termination the former participating member shall not be entitled to
the return of all or any part of his or her initial contribution, and the
indemnity coverage shall thereupon terminate as to all claims then pending against
such person and in respect to all occurrences prior to the date of such
termination of membership. However, in the event the interindemnity
arrangement is then providing legal defense services to such person, the
interindemnity arrangement shall continue to provide those services for a
period of ten days following such termination. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next